Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.116.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with the attendance of the institution of higher education as determined by the office of student financial assistance, including but not limited to tuition, room, board, and books.

(2) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is between the ages of sixteen and twenty-three;

(b) Has been in foster care in the state of Washington for a minimum of six months since his or her fourteenth birthday;

(c) Is a student who demonstrates financial need, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(d) Is a resident student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2);

(e) Has entered or will enter an institution of higher education in Washington state within three years of high school graduation or having successfully completed his or her high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536;

(f) Is not pursuing a degree in theology; and

(g) Makes satisfactory progress towards the completion of a degree or certificate program.

(3) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the student achievement council.

(4) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

[ 2019 c 406 s 35; 2013 c 39 s 10; 2012 c 229 s 568. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 214; 2005 c 215 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.